Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.005

Commission—Powers and duties.

The commission shall:

(1) Regulate the practice of pharmacy and enforce all laws placed under its jurisdiction;

(2) Prepare or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading of, examinations for applicants for pharmacists' licenses;

(3) Establish the qualifications for licensure of pharmacists or pharmacy interns;

(4) Conduct hearings for the revocation or suspension of licenses, permits, registrations, certificates, or any other authority to practice granted by the commission, which hearings may also be conducted by an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW or a presiding officer designated by the commission. The commission may authorize the secretary, or their designee, to serve as the presiding officer for any disciplinary proceedings of the commission. The presiding officer shall not vote on or make any final decision in cases pertaining to standards of practice or where clinical expertise is necessary. All functions performed by the presiding officer shall be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(5) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any hearing, or disciplinary proceeding held under this chapter or any other chapter assigned to the commission;

(6) Assist the regularly constituted enforcement agencies of this state in enforcing all laws pertaining to drugs, controlled substances, and the practice of pharmacy, or any other laws or rules under its jurisdiction;

(7) Promulgate rules for the dispensing, distribution, wholesaling, and manufacturing of drugs and devices and the practice of pharmacy for the protection and promotion of the public health, safety, and welfare. Violation of any such rules shall constitute grounds for denial of an application, assessment of a civil fine, imposition of a limited stop service, imposition of reasonable conditions, suspension, revocation, or modification of licenses or any other authority to practice issued by the commission;

(8) Adopt rules establishing and governing continuing education requirements for pharmacists and other licensees applying for renewal of licenses under this chapter;

(9) Be immune, collectively and individually, from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed as members of the commission. Such immunity shall apply to employees of the department when acting in the course of disciplinary proceedings;

(10) Suggest strategies for preventing, reducing, and eliminating drug misuse, diversion, and abuse, including professional and public education, and treatment of persons misusing and abusing drugs;

(11) Conduct or encourage educational programs to be conducted to prevent the misuse, diversion, and abuse of drugs for health care practitioners and licensed or certified health care facilities;

(12) Monitor trends of drug misuse, diversion, and abuse and make periodic reports to disciplinary boards of licensed health care practitioners and education, treatment, and appropriate law enforcement agencies regarding these trends;

(13) Enter into written agreements with all other state and federal agencies with any responsibility for controlling drug misuse, diversion, or abuse and with health maintenance organizations, health care service contractors, and health care providers to assist and promote coordination of agencies responsible for ensuring compliance with controlled substances laws and to monitor observance of these laws and cooperation between these agencies. The department of social and health services, the department of labor and industries, and any other state agency including licensure disciplinary boards, shall refer all apparent instances of over-prescribing by practitioners and all apparent instances of legend drug overuse to the department. The department shall also encourage such referral by health maintenance organizations, health service contractors, and health care providers;

(14) Whenever the workload of the commission requires, request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members. While serving as members pro tempore persons have all the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses, of the commission.

[ 2024 c 121 s 29; 2022 c 240 s 15; 2013 c 19 s 5; 1990 c 83 s 1; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 409; 1984 c 153 s 2; 1981 c 67 s 21; 1979 c 90 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 18 s 2; 1963 c 38 s 18; 1935 c 98 s 3; RRS s 10132-2. Formerly RCW 43.69.030.]

NOTES:

Section captions not law—1990 c 83: "Section captions as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1990 c 83 s 3.]

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.